Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 2. Public Indecency

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of church or religious society for sexual misconduct of clergy, 5 ALR5th 530.

§ 6-4-201.
Public indecency; exception; penalties.

A person is guilty of public indecency if, while in a public place where he may reasonably be expected to be viewed by others, he:

Performs an act of sexual intrusion, as defined by W.S. 6-2-301(a)(vii); or

Exposes his intimate parts, as defined by W.S. 6-2-301(a)(ii), with the intent of arousing the sexual desire of himself or another person; or

Engages in sexual contact, as defined by W.S. 6-2-301(a)(vi), with or without consent, with the intent of arousing the sexual desire of himself or another person.

The act of breastfeeding an infant child, including breastfeeding in any place where the woman may legally be, does not constitute public indecency.

Public indecency is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2007, ch. 166, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (b) and redesignated former (b) as (c).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “public place” within meaning of statutes prohibiting commission of sexual act in public place, 96 ALR3d 692.

Indecent exposure: what is “person,” 63 ALR4th 1040.

Regulation of exposure of female, but not male breasts, 67 ALR5th 431.

What constitutes “public place” within meaning of state statute or local ordinance prohibiting indecency or commission of sexual act in public place, 95 ALR5th 229.